Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5255.01
Waiting period, defined.

Waiting period means the period that must pass with respect to an individual before the individual is eligible to be covered for benefits under the terms of the health benefit plan. If an individual enrolls as a late enrollee or on a special enrollment date, any period before such late or special enrollment is not a waiting period.

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 37.